Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.500

Violations—Application of consumer protection act.

For the purposes of application of the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW, any material violation of the provisions of this chapter shall be construed to constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice or unfair method of competition in the conduct of trade or commerce.

[ 1982 c 69 s 21.]